Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in and Contributions to the Fund

47-12-40.
Eligibility to participate in the fund.

All district attorneys of judicial circuits of this state who qualify under this chapter shall be eligible to participate in the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 8.

47-12-41.
Payments by district attorneys into the fund.

All district attorneys who qualify under this chapter shall pay into the fund the amount of 5 percent of their state salary for each year; and any district attorney who makes payment to this fund shall be eligible to retire from the office and be eligible to the appointment of district attorney emeritus, at a salary of one-half of what he has previously received as compensation as state salary for the final calendar year of his service as active district attorney of his circuit.

Each district attorney who is now in office and who is otherwise eligible to participate in the benefits provided by this chapter shall make his or her payments to the fund until his or her retirement. Any such district attorney who is eligible to participate in the fund but who has not made the payments set forth in this Code section may pay such amounts into the fund not later than July 1, 1961, with interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum on all amounts due since February 17, 1949, to the date of payment to the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia.

Any district attorney who was not in office on February 17, 1949, and who had previously served as a district attorney in this state may qualify and be eligible to participate in the benefits provided by this chapter by paying 5 percent of the existing salary or annual fees of such district attorney, plus interest at 5 percent per annum from February 17, 1949, to the date of payment to the fund, as though he or she had been in office since that date. Such payment shall be made into the fund within six months after reentering upon the duties of district attorney. Such person shall continue to pay into the fund the amount of 5 percent of his or her salary or fees for each year thereafter until he or she is in at least his or her nineteenth year of service, including service prior to and subsequent to February 17, 1949.

District attorneys who qualify under this chapter must make payments to the fund for the entire period set forth in Code Section 47-12-60 and until retirement and must remain in office and render service as an active district attorney for the entire qualifying period or shall have rendered a part of such service as solicitor of a city court from which direct appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals of Georgia, or otherwise as is provided and set forth in Code Section 47-12-60.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 9; Ga. L. 1950, p. 228, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 211, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 163, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 226, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1632, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 15; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 9/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (b), inserted “or her” twice in the first sentence and substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “Fiscal Division of the Department of Administrative Services” at the beginning of the last sentence.

47-12-42.
Spouses’ benefits coverage; payments required for such coverage; effect of spouse’s death, divorce, or remarriage.

Any district attorney who is married shall pay into the fund an amount equal to 2 1/2 percent of his state salary for each year of service, up to a maximum of 19 years, for spouses’ benefits coverage. Such payment shall entitle his surviving spouse to receive from the State of Georgia, for life or until remarriage, a sum equal to 50 percent of the benefits which he was receiving on the date of his death, if retired at such time, or which he would have been eligible to receive had he retired as of that date if he had 19 years of creditable service as of the date of his death. If such district attorney had completed spouses’ contributions for at least ten years of creditable service as a district attorney, but for less than 19 years of creditable service as of the date of his death, his surviving spouse who is eligible for such benefits under this Code section shall be entitled to receive, for life or until remarriage, a sum equal to the amount determined by multiplying one-half of the benefit he would have been entitled to receive upon completion of 19 years of creditable service without change in the salary he was receiving at the time of his death times the fraction which his creditable service bears to 19 years. Those members with more than 19 years of creditable service shall utilize the salary level of the most recent 19 years of service when determining the contribution for spouses’ benefits. Any member who was compensated by the fee system prior to 1969 shall pay the required 2 1/2 percent contribution for spouses’ benefits on the basis of $9,000.00 per annum, if such fees were less than that amount, or on the basis of the actual fees received, if more than $9,000.00 per annum, up to a maximum of $18,000.00 as the basis for such contributions. In addition to such contributions, a member obtaining spouses’ benefits shall pay interest on such contributions at the rate of 5 percent compounded annually up to the date of payment of such contributions. All contributions to obtain creditable service for the purpose of spouses’ benefits, plus interest thereon, shall be paid by March 24, 1982. A member who is not married shall not be required to make contributions as provided in this Code section for spouses’ benefits; but if such member subsequently marries, he shall be required to begin making contributions for spouses’ benefits and shall also make such contributions for prior service within two years after becoming married. If the spouse of a member dies or if a member becomes divorced, contributions for spouses’ benefits shall cease upon notice to the board of trustees from the member of such death or divorce; but if such member subsequently remarries, he shall notify the board of trustees of such remarriage, and contributions for spouses’ benefits shall be reinstated. If a member ceases making contributions for spouses’ benefits for any reason, there shall be no return to the member of contributions for such spouses’ benefits.

Any other provision of subsection (a) of this Code section or any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any married district attorney emeritus receiving an emeritus salary on July 1, 1992, who was married for at least one year prior to that date and whose spouse is not otherwise eligible for spouses’ benefits shall have the option to reduce his emeritus salary by 10 percent and establish a surviving spouse’s benefit equal to one-half of the reduced emeritus salary. Upon the death of a district attorney emeritus who exercised such option, the spouse’s benefit provided for in this subsection shall be paid to the surviving spouse in equal monthly installments for life or until the surviving spouse remarries. The option for spouses’ benefits for district attorneys emeritus provided for in this subsection must be exercised in writing to the board of trustees by not later than December 31, 1992.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 939, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2361, § 1.

47-12-43.
Manner of deduction of payments to the fund; penalty for late payments; payments made on behalf of the district attorney.

The payment into the fund either of 5 percent or 7 1/2 percent, as applicable, of the state salary shall be deducted monthly by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia from the salary of each district attorney who is a member of the fund. If any such payments have not been made by February 15 of the succeeding year, the sum due shall incur a penalty of 6 percent interest per annum computed on the principal amount from February 15 until actually paid. Beginning with the payments to be made covering the calendar year 1964, and for each calendar year thereafter, if the sum due is not paid by February 15 of the succeeding year, such sum due shall be increased by 10 percent plus 6 percent interest per annum, computed on the sum due plus the additional 10 percent, from February 15 until the date of actual payment of the entire amount.

All payments shall be accompanied by an affidavit from the district attorney as to the correctness of the amount of state salary received by him during the period covered by such payments.

Beginning July 1, 1980, the employer shall pay to the fund on each and every payroll period employee contributions on behalf and to the credit of such district attorneys in an amount equal to the amount which would be paid to the annuity savings fund pursuant to Code Section 47-2-54 if the district attorney were a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Such district attorneys shall continue to have deducted from their state salaries the additional amount of employee contributions required by this chapter.

The monthly employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of a district attorney as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section shall be used in the computation of the district attorney’s state salary for the computation of retirement benefits.

All members shall retain, have, and be subject to all other rights, privileges, obligations, and duties provided for by other provisions of this chapter; and all such other provisions shall remain of full force and effect with respect to any matter not specifically provided for in subsections (c) and (d) and this subsection of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 10; Ga. L. 1958, p. 163, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 758, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1632, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 939, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 17; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 10/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “Department of Administrative Services” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a).

47-12-44.
Transfer of membership and contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; payment of additional state contribution upon transfer.

The board of trustees shall transfer to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia all contributions made to the fund by a member who transfers to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated or otherwise available an additional amount equal to the 5 percent contribution of such member plus an additional 20 percent of the contribution, so that the state contribution shall be in accordance with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 251, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 11/SB 109.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, near the middle of this Code section, substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” and substituted “or otherwise available” for “for the operating expenses of the superior courts of this state”.